Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.280

Suicide prevention training program—Required education.

(1) The board, in consultation with the University of Washington's forefront suicide prevention center of excellence and affected professional associations, shall develop a suicide prevention training program for veterinarians and veterinary technicians by June 30, 2022. The program must:

(a) Recognize that veterinarians treat animal patients and have limited interaction with animal patient owners;

(b) Focus on mental health and well-being;

(c) Include general content on suicide risk, prevention, and resourcing, and specific content on imminent harm by lethal means; and

(d) Be three hours in length.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2022, all veterinarians and veterinary technicians shall complete the training program developed by the board. The training must be completed during the first full continuing education reporting period after July 1, 2022, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. The board may exempt any veterinarian or veterinary technician who completed training substantially equivalent to the training developed under subsection (1) of this section in the three years prior to July 1, 2022.

(3) The hours spent completing training under this section count toward meeting any applicable continuing education requirements for veterinarians and veterinary technicians.

(4) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to expand or limit the scope of practice of a veterinarian or veterinary technician.

[ 2020 c 229 s 2.]